Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.100

Waiver of jury.

In case a jury is waived, the compensation that shall be paid for the premises taken shall be determined by the court and the proceedings shall be the same as in the trial of issues of fact by the court in other civil actions.

[ 1909 p 374 s 10; 1903 c 111 s 10; RRS s 915.]